Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.540.060

Bond, excess levy, elections—Use of proceeds.

Within sixty days after receipt of the notice of approval from the educational service district superintendent, the board of directors of each school district included in the plan shall submit to the voters thereof a proposal or proposals for providing, through the issuance of bonds and/or the authorization of an excess tax levy, the amount of capital funds that the district is required to provide under the plan. The proceeds of any such bond issue and/or excess tax levy shall be credited to the capital projects fund of the school district in which the proposed high school facilities are to be located and shall be expended to pay the cost of high school facilities for the education of such students residing in the school districts as are included in the plan and not otherwise.

[ 1985 c 7 s 92; 1975 1st ex.s. c 275 s 76; 1971 c 48 s 23; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.56.050. Prior: 1959 c 262 s 6; 1955 c 344 s 5; 1953 c 229 s 5. Formerly RCW 28A.56.050, 28.56.050.]

NOTES:

Severability—1971 c 48: See note following RCW 28A.310.250.